Louisiana, session 2026, SB198.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 25:742 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§742. Applicability of historic district commission powers
A. It is the intent and purpose of this Chapter that the regulatory powers
conferred by it on an historic preservation district commission, created under its
authority, shall apply to all private property, in the area controlled by it, including
all buildings, structures, areas, sites, and their adjuncts and appurtenances, insofar
as they constitute part of the entirety or tout ensemble of the historic section. Any
governmental agency of the state or local government, other than the governing
body, having a responsibility for any building, structure, area, site, public way and
their adjuncts and appurtenances within the historic preservation site shall seek the
advice of the historic district commission prior to the initiation of any substantive
change, modification, renovation, restoration or construction a new construction
project in the locally designated historic district.
B. Except for state infrastructure projects, a state or local governmental
agency shall not commence a new construction project within a locally
designated historic district or at a locally designated landmark unless a
certificate of appropriateness has been issued by the historic preservation
district commission with jurisdiction over the locally designated historic district
or locally designated landmark, unless the commission waives this requirement.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 198 ENROLLED
For purposes of this Section, a new construction project shall mean the creation
of an entirely new building or structure that will be permanently attached to the
ground.
C. A historic preservation district commission is authorized to institute
civil cause of action, including for injunctive relief, to enforce the provisions of
this Section.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.